Maine, session 132, LD1632.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 23 MRSA §73-B is enacted to read:
§73-B. Transportation planning incentive funding
The department shall administer a program of transportation planning incentive
funding as described in this section.
1. Community transportation plan. To be eligible for incentive funding under this
section, a municipality, on its own or in collaboration with neighboring communities, must
adopt a community transportation plan addressing the manner in which development along
state transportation corridors in the municipality or municipalities is to occur. A
municipality that adopts a community transportation plan shall incorporate any land use
development strategies recommended in the plan into its local ordinances. The community
transportation plan and related policies, programs and ordinances must be designed to meet
the objectives of the Sensible Transportation Policy Act and rules adopted pursuant to that
Act and to the greatest practicable extent reduce the need to make costly transportation
capacity and retrofitting improvements in the future. The department shall provide
technical assistance to municipalities in developing community transportation plans
through regional planning councils or other agencies or consultants designated by the
department. For purposes of this section, "community transportation plan" means a
transportation plan developed by one or more communities along a state transportation
corridor, including, but not limited to, a community transportation plan that is part of a
comprehensive plan developed pursuant to Title 30-A, chapter 187, subchapter 2 that is
designed to strengthen the functional viability and lengthen the long-term life of state
transportation corridors.
2. Transportation incentive funding. A municipality or a group of municipalities
may apply for transportation incentive funding under this section by submitting to the
department a community transportation plan including relevant policies, programs and
ordinances, an application for incentive funding on a form provided by the department and
a proposal describing the transportation improvements for which the incentive funding will
be used. The department shall authorize incentive funding amounts, within available funds,
based on a competitive rating system established by the department by rule. The
department shall publicize available funding at least biennially. Incentive funding must be
commensurate with the merits of a plan and related policies, programs and ordinances and
for an amount that does not exceed the estimated cost of the specific investment proposal.
The projected transportation-related avoided costs from implementation of the community
transportation plan must exceed the amount of the incentive funding as determined by the
department in its rating system. A municipality shall pay back to the department any
incentive funding provided by the department under this section if the municipality repeals
or revises its community transportation plan or related ordinance provisions within 10 years
of receipt of the incentive funding, unless the repeal or revision is approved by the
department.
3. Use of incentive funding. A municipality or a group of municipalities may use
incentive funding received pursuant to this section to:
A. Purchase rural lands adjacent to state highways to secure access rights; and
Page 1 - 132LR2369(01)

B. Plan the development of a public way as defined by Title 29-A, section 101,
subsection 59 or a town way as defined in section 3021, subsection 3.
4. Rules. The department shall adopt rules to implement this section. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. 23 MRSA §704, sub-§6, as amended by PL 2013, c. 220, §1, is further
amended to read:
6. Access denied. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Title, the The
Department of Transportation and the municipalities shall deny ingress to and egress from
property abutting a controlled access the highway established when access rights have been
acquired by the department pursuant to chapter 7, except that the Commissioner of
Transportation may allow access for the development of state and state aid highways and
may allow access upon a determination by the commissioner that such access will not
adversely affect public safety and will not have a significant negative impact on the
mobility of through-travelers. The commissioner may approve or deny a relocation of an
existing break in a control of access consistent with the rules adopted pursuant to subsection
2.
Sec. 3. 23 MRSA §704, sub-§10, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 188, §1, is amended to
read:
10. Requirements waived. The department may waive the requirements of rules
adopted pursuant to this section and may issue a permit for a driveway when the property
abuts no other road affording vehicular access to a person's property and the property is
outside the compact area of an urban compact municipality only if the property is located
within a locally designated growth area identified in a state-approved comprehensive plan
pursuant to Title 30-A, section 4326. The department may not deny a person the right to
build on or to have vehicular access to property owned by that person unless the access is
determined inconsistent with access management safety standards. The department shall
coordinate all access management waivers with the Maine Redevelopment Land Bank
Authority established in Title 30-A, section 5154 and the Maine Office of Community
Affairs established in Title 5, section 3202.
Sec. 4. Funding. The Department of Transportation shall solicit municipal incentive
funding applications under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 23, section 73-B beginning in
fiscal year 2026-27 and shall identify suitable sources for providing incentive funding
beginning in fiscal year 2027-28. Funding must be derived from funds available under the
Department of Transportation's quality communities initiative programs.